Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.160

County ferry districts—General property tax levies.

At the time of making general tax levies in each year, the county legislative authority of the county in which a ferry district is located shall make the required levies for district purposes against the real and personal property in the district. The tax levies must be a part of the general tax roll and be collected as a part of the general taxes against the property in the district.

[ 2003 c 83 s 306.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.